Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 2

Judicial Proceedings

35-15-201. Role of court in administration of trust.

The court may intervene in the administration of a trust to the extent its jurisdiction is invoked by an interested person or as provided by law.

A trust is not subject to continuing judicial supervision unless ordered by the court.

A judicial proceeding involving a trust may relate to any matter involving the trust's administration, including a request for instructions and an action to declare rights.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 14.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, § 17.

35-15-202. Jurisdiction over trustee and beneficiary.

By accepting the trusteeship of a trust having its principal place of administration in this state or by moving the principal place of administration to this state, the trustee submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter involving the trust.

With respect to their interests in the trust, the beneficiaries of a trust having its principal place of administration in this state are subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter involving the trust. By accepting a distribution from such a trust, the recipient submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter involving the trust.

This section does not preclude other methods of obtaining jurisdiction over a trustee, beneficiary, or other person receiving property from the trust.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 15.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, § 17.

35-15-203. Subject matter jurisdiction.

Chancery courts and other courts of record having probate jurisdiction:

To the exclusion of all other courts, have concurrent jurisdiction over proceedings in this state brought by a trustee or beneficiary concerning the administration of a trust; and

Have concurrent jurisdiction with other courts of record in this state over other proceedings involving a trust.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 16; 2012, ch. 886, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 886, § 13 provided that § 10 of the act, which amended this section, shall apply to any proceeding occurring on or after July 1, 2004, because the section clarifies existing law as enacted by chapter 537, § 16 of the Tennessee Public Acts of 2004.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, § 17.

35-15-204. Venue.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), venue for a judicial proceeding involving a trust is in the county of this state in which the trust's principal place of administration is or will be located and, if the trust is created by will and the estate is not yet closed, in the county in which the decedent's estate is being administered.

If a trust has no trustee, venue for a judicial proceeding for the appointment of a trustee is in a county of this state in which a beneficiary resides, in a county in which any trust property is located, and if the trust is created by will, in the county in which the decedent's estate was or is being administered.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 17.

35-15-205. Petition for final accounting upon resignation or removal of trustee or termination of trust.

If the trustee resigns, is removed, or upon the full or partial termination of the trust, a qualified beneficiary or successor trustee may petition the court to require the trustee transferring or distributing the trust to appear before the court for a final accounting. However, a successor trustee shall not have any obligation to petition the court to require the final accounting. The trustee transferring or distributing the trust may also petition the court to approve a final accounting relieving the trustee from liability for the period of its administration. The final accounting period shall begin from the latest of:

The date of acceptance of the trusteeship by the trustee; or

The end of the period since an accounting was last approved by the court.

The petition shall set forth:

The name and address of the trustee;

The qualified beneficiaries of the trust; and

The period that the accounting covers.

The petition shall be served on each qualified beneficiary or their representative under part 3 of this chapter to the extent there is no material conflict of interest or on the trustee.

Upon review of the trustee's final accounting and after considering any objections thereto and any evidence presented, the court may approve the final accounting or enter judgment granting appropriate relief. If no objection to the petition is filed within the time allowed by law after service, or if the parties consent, the petition may be approved without notice, hearing, or further proceedings. The final judgment of the court shall be binding on all parties.

Upon approval of the petition, the trustee shall be relieved from liability for the period covered by the final accounting.

Costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees of the trustee, shall be taxed against the trust, unless otherwise directed by the court.

Acts 2019, ch. 340, § 9.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 340, § 20. May 10, 2019.